Utah statutes.
62A-16-204.   Fatality Review Committee Proceedings.

(1)  A majority vote of committee members present constitutes the action of the committee.

(2)  The department shall give the committee access to all reports, records, and other documents that are relevant to the fatality under investigation, including:

(a)  narrative reports;

(b)  case files;

(c)  autopsy reports; and

(d)  police reports, unless the report is protected from disclosure under Subsection 63G-2-305(9) or (10).

(3)  The Utah State Hospital and the Utah State Developmental Center shall provide protected health information to the committee if requested by a fatality review coordinator.

(4)  A committee shall convene its first meeting within 14 days after the day on which a formal fatality review is ordered under Subsection 62A-16-201(6), unless this time is extended, for good cause, by the director of the Office of Services Review.

(5)  A committee may interview a staff member, a provider, or any other person who may have knowledge or expertise that is relevant to the fatality review.

(6)  A committee shall render an advisory opinion regarding:

(a)  whether the provisions of law, rule, policy, and procedure relating to the deceased individual and the deceased individual's family were complied with;

(b)  whether the fatality was responded to properly;

(c)  whether to recommend that a law, rule, policy, or procedure be changed; and

(d)  whether additional training is needed.

